Utah statutes.
26-50-201.   Traumatic Brain Injury Fund.

(1)  There is created an expendable special revenue fund entitled the Traumatic Brain Injury Fund.

(2)  The fund shall consist of:

(a)  gifts, grants, donations, or any other conveyance of money that may be made to the fund from private sources; and

(b)  additional amounts as appropriated by the Legislature.

(3)  The fund shall be administered by the executive director.

(4)  Fund money may be used to:

(a)  educate the general public and professionals regarding understanding, treatment, and prevention of traumatic brain injury;

(b)  provide access to evaluations and coordinate short-term care to assist an individual in identifying services or support needs, resources, and benefits for which the individual may be eligible;

(c)  develop and support an information and referral system for persons with a traumatic brain injury and their families; and

(d)  provide grants to persons or organizations to provide the services described in Subsections (4)(a), (b), and (c).

(5)  Not less that 50% of the fund shall be used each fiscal year to directly assist individuals who meet the qualifications described in Subsection (6).

(6)  An individual who receives services either paid for from the fund, or through an organization under contract with the fund, shall:

(a)  be a resident of Utah;

(b)  have been diagnosed by a qualified professional as having a traumatic brain injury which results in impairment of cognitive or physical function; and

(c)  have a need that can be met within the requirements of this chapter.

(7)  The fund may not duplicate any services or support mechanisms being provided to an individual by any other government or private agency.

(8)  All actual and necessary operating expenses for the committee and staff shall be paid by the fund.

(9)  The fund may not be used for medical treatment, long-term care, or acute care.



Amended by Chapter 400, 2013 General Session

